District of Columbia statutes.
6-641.06

Permissible maximum height of buildings.

The permissible height of buildings in any district shall not exceed the maximum height of buildings now authorized upon any street in any part of the District of Columbia by subchapter I of this chapter, regulating the height of buildings in the District of Columbia.

History

June 20, 1938, 52 Stat. 798, ch. 534, § 6
Oct. 13, 1964, 78 Stat. 1091, Pub. L. 88-659, § 1
Aug. 24, 1982, 96 Stat. 290, Pub. L. 97-241, § 203(c)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-651.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-418.
1973 Ed., § 5-418.

Effective Dates

Section 204 of Public Law 97-241 provided that the amendments made by title II shall take effect on October 1, 1982.